Ohio, session 136, SB280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 4501.01, 4505.08, 4505.111, and 4513.02 be amended and sections 4503.184, 4505.073, and 4513.381 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 4501.01. As used in this chapter and Chapters 4503., 4505., 4507., 4509., 4510., 4513., 4515., and 4517. of the Revised Code, and in the penal laws, except as otherwise provided: (A) "Vehicles" means everything on wheels or runners, including motorized bicycles, but does not mean electric personal assistive mobility devices, low-speed micromobility devices, vehicles that are operated exclusively on rails or tracks or from overhead electric trolley wires, and vehicles that belong to any police department, municipal fire department, or volunteer fire department, or that are used by such a department in the discharge of its functions. (B) "Motor vehicle" means any vehicle, including mobile homes and recreational vehicles, that is propelled or drawn by power other than muscular power or power collected from overhead electric trolley wires. "Motor vehicle" does not include utility vehicles as defined in division (VV) of this section, under-speed vehicles as defined in division (XX) of this section, mini-trucks as defined in division (BBB) of this section, motorized bicycles, electric bicycles, road rollers, traction engines, power shovels, power cranes, and other equipment used in construction work and not designed for or employed in general highway transportation, well-drilling machinery, ditch-digging machinery, farm machinery, and trailers that are designed and used exclusively to transport a boat between a place of storage and a marina, or in and around a marina, when drawn or towed on a public road or highway for a distance of no more than ten miles and at a speed of twenty-five miles per hour or less. (C) "Agricultural tractor" and "traction engine" mean any self-propelling vehicle that is designed or used for drawing other vehicles or wheeled machinery, but has no provisions for carrying loads independently of such other vehicles, and that is used principally for agricultural purposes. (D) "Commercial tractor," except as defined in division (C) of this section, means any motor vehicle that has motive power and either is designed or used for drawing other motor vehicles, or is designed or used for drawing another motor vehicle while carrying a portion of the other motor vehicle or its load, or both. (E) "Passenger car" means any motor vehicle that is designed and used for carrying not more than nine persons and includes any motor vehicle that is designed and used for carrying not more than fifteen persons in a ridesharing arrangement. (F) "Collector's vehicle" means any motor vehicle or agricultural tractor or traction engine that is of special interest, that has a fair market value of one hundred dollars or more, whether operable or not, and that is owned, operated, collected, preserved, restored, maintained, or used essentially as a collector's item, leisure pursuit, or investment, but not as the owner's principal means of transportation. "Licensed collector's vehicle" means a collector's vehicle, other than an agricultural tractor or traction engine, that displays current, valid license tags issued under section 4503.45 of the Revised Code, or a similar type of motor vehicle that displays current, valid license tags issued under substantially equivalent provisions in the laws of other states. (G) "Historical motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle that is over twenty-five years old and is owned solely as a collector's item and for participation in club activities, exhibitions, tours, parades, and similar uses, but that in no event is used for general transportation. (H) "Noncommercial motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle, including a farm truck as defined in section 4503.04 of the Revised Code, that is designed by the manufacturer to carry a load of no more than one ton and is used exclusively for purposes other than engaging in business for profit. (I) "Bus" means any motor vehicle that has motor power and is designed and used for carrying more than nine passengers, except any motor vehicle that is designed and used for carrying not more than fifteen passengers in a ridesharing arrangement. (J) "Commercial car" or "truck" means any motor vehicle that has motor power and is designed and used for carrying merchandise or freight, or that is used as a commercial tractor. (K) "Bicycle" has the same meaning as in section 4511.01 of the Revised Code. (L) "Motorized bicycle" or "moped" means any vehicle that either has two tandem wheels or one wheel in the front and two wheels in the rear, that may be pedaled, and that is equipped with a helper motor of not more than fifty cubic centimeters piston displacement that produces no more than one brake horsepower and is capable of propelling the vehicle at a speed of no greater than twenty miles per hour on a level surface. "Motorized bicycle" or "moped" does not include an electric bicycle. (M) "Trailer" means any vehicle without motive power that is designed or used for carrying property or persons wholly on its own structure and for being drawn by a motor vehicle, and includes any such vehicle that is formed by or operated as a combination of a semitrailer and a vehicle of the dolly type such as that commonly known as a trailer dolly, a vehicle used to transport agricultural produce or agricultural production materials between a local place of storage or supply and the farm when drawn or towed on a public road or highway at a speed greater than twenty-five miles per hour, and a vehicle that is designed and used exclusively to transport a boat between a place of storage and a marina, or in and around a marina, when drawn or towed on a public road or highway for a distance of more than ten miles or at a speed of more than twenty-five miles per hour. "Trailer" does not include a manufactured home or travel trailer. (N) "Noncommercial trailer" means any trailer, except a travel trailer or trailer that is used to transport a boat as described in division (B) of this section, but, where applicable, includes a vehicle that is used to transport a boat as described in division (M) of this section, that has a gross weight of no more than ten thousand pounds, and that is used exclusively for purposes other than engaging in business for a profit, such as the transportation of personal items for personal or recreational purposes. (O) "Mobile home" means a building unit or assembly of closed construction that is fabricated in an off-site facility, is more than thirty-five body feet in length or, when erected on site, is three hundred twenty or more square feet, is built on a permanent chassis, is transportable in one or more sections, and does not qualify as a manufactured home as defined in division (C)(4) of section 3781.06 of the Revised Code or as an industrialized unit as defined in division (C)(3) of section 3781.06 of the Revised Code. (P) "Semitrailer" means any vehicle of the trailer type that does not have motive power and is so designed or used with another and separate motor vehicle that in operation a part of its own weight or that of its load, or both, rests upon and is carried by the other vehicle furnishing the motive power for propelling itself and the vehicle referred to in this division, and includes, for the purpose only of registration and taxation under those chapters, any vehicle of the dolly type, such as a trailer dolly, that is designed or used for the conversion of a semitrailer into a trailer. (Q) "Recreational vehicle" means a vehicular portable structure that meets all of the following conditions: (1) It is designed for the sole purpose of recreational travel. (2) It is not used for the purpose of engaging in business for profit. (3) It is not used for the purpose of engaging in intrastate commerce. (4) It is not used for the purpose of commerce as defined in 49 C.F.R. 383.5, as amended. (5) It is not regulated by the public utilities commission pursuant to Chapter 4905., 4921., or 4923. of the Revised Code. (6) It is classed as one of the following: (a) "Travel trailer" or "house vehicle" means a nonself-propelled recreational vehicle that does not exceed an overall length of forty feet, exclusive of bumper and tongue or coupling. "Travel trailer" includes a tent-type fold-out camping trailer as defined in section 4517.01 of the Revised Code. (b) "Motor home" means a self-propelled recreational vehicle that has no fifth wheel and is constructed with permanently installed facilities for cold storage, cooking and consuming of food, and for sleeping. (c) "Truck camper" means a nonself-propelled recreational vehicle that does not have wheels for road use and is designed to be placed upon and attached to a motor vehicle. "Truck camper" does not include truck covers that consist of walls and a roof, but do not have floors and facilities enabling them to be used as a dwelling. (d) "Fifth wheel trailer" means a vehicle that is of such size and weight as to be movable without a special highway permit, that is constructed with a raised forward section that allows a bi-level floor plan, and that is designed to be towed by a vehicle equipped with a fifth-wheel hitch ordinarily installed in the bed of a truck. (e) "Park trailer" means a vehicle that is commonly known as a park model recreational vehicle, meets the American national standard institute standard A119.5 (1988) for park trailers, is built on a single chassis, has a gross trailer area of four hundred square feet or less when set up, is designed for seasonal or temporary living quarters, and may be connected to utilities necessary for the operation of installed features and appliances. (R) "Pneumatic tires" means tires of rubber and fabric or tires of similar material, that are inflated with air. (S) "Solid tires" means tires of rubber or similar elastic material that are not dependent upon confined air for support of the load. (T) "Solid tire vehicle" means any vehicle that is equipped with two or more solid tires. (U) "Farm machinery" means all machines and tools that are used in the production, harvesting, and care of farm products, and includes trailers that are used to transport agricultural produce or agricultural production materials between a local place of storage or supply and the farm, agricultural tractors, threshing machinery, hay-baling machinery, corn shellers, hammermills, and machinery used in the production of horticultural, agricultural, and vegetable products. (V) "Owner" includes any person or firm, other than a manufacturer or dealer, that has title to a motor vehicle, except that, in sections 4505.01 to 4505.19 of the Revised Code, "owner" includes in addition manufacturers and dealers. (W) "Manufacturer" and "dealer" include all persons and firms that are regularly engaged in the business of manufacturing, selling, displaying, offering for sale, or dealing in motor vehicles, at an established place of business that is used exclusively for the purpose of manufacturing, selling, displaying, offering for sale, or dealing in motor vehicles. A place of business that is used for manufacturing, selling, displaying, offering for sale, or dealing in motor vehicles shall be deemed to be used exclusively for those purposes even though snowmobiles or all-purpose vehicles are sold or displayed for sale thereat, even though farm machinery is sold or displayed for sale thereat, or even though repair, accessory, gasoline and oil, storage, parts, service, or paint departments are maintained thereat, or, in any county having a population of less than seventy-five thousand at the last federal census, even though a department in a place of business is used to dismantle, salvage, or rebuild motor vehicles by means of used parts, if such departments are operated for the purpose of furthering and assisting in the business of manufacturing, selling, displaying, offering for sale, or dealing in motor vehicles. Places of business or departments in a place of business used to dismantle, salvage, or rebuild motor vehicles by means of using used parts are not considered as being maintained for the purpose of assisting or furthering the manufacturing, selling, displaying, and offering for sale or dealing in motor vehicles. (X) "Operator" includes any person who drives or operates a motor vehicle upon the public highways. (Y) "Chauffeur" means any operator who operates a motor vehicle, other than a taxicab, as an employee for hire; or any operator whether or not the owner of a motor vehicle, other than a taxicab, who operates such vehicle for transporting, for gain, compensation, or profit, either persons or property owned by another. Any operator of a motor vehicle who is voluntarily involved in a ridesharing arrangement is not considered an employee for hire or operating such vehicle for gain, compensation, or profit. (Z) "State" includes the territories and federal districts of the United States, and the provinces of Canada. (AA) "Public roads and highways" for vehicles includes all public thoroughfares, bridges, and culverts. (BB) "Manufacturer's number" means the manufacturer's original serial number that is affixed to or imprinted upon the chassis or other part of the motor vehicle. (CC) "Motor number" means the manufacturer's original number that is affixed to or imprinted upon the engine or motor of the vehicle. (DD) "Distributor" means any person who is authorized by a motor vehicle manufacturer to distribute new motor vehicles to licensed motor vehicle dealers at an established place of business that is used exclusively for the purpose of distributing new motor vehicles to licensed motor vehicle dealers, except when the distributor also is a new motor vehicle dealer, in which case the distributor may distribute at the location of the distributor's licensed dealership. (EE) "Ridesharing arrangement" means the transportation of persons in a motor vehicle where the transportation is incidental to another purpose of a volunteer driver and includes ridesharing arrangements known as carpools, vanpools, and buspools. (FF) "Apportionable vehicle" means any vehicle that is used or intended for use in two or more international registration plan member jurisdictions that allocate or proportionally register vehicles, that is used for the transportation of persons for hire or designed, used, or maintained primarily for the transportation of property, and that meets any of the following qualifications: (1) Is a power unit having a gross vehicle weight in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds; (2) Is a power unit having three or more axles, regardless of the gross vehicle weight; (3) Is a combination vehicle with a gross vehicle weight in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds. "Apportionable vehicle" does not include recreational vehicles, vehicles displaying restricted plates, city pick-up and delivery vehicles, or vehicles owned and operated by the United States, this state, or any political subdivisions thereof. (GG) "Chartered party" means a group of persons who contract as a group to acquire the exclusive use of a passenger-carrying motor vehicle at a fixed charge for the vehicle in accordance with the carrier's tariff, lawfully on file with the United States department of transportation, for the purpose of group travel to a specified destination or for a particular itinerary, either agreed upon in advance or modified by the chartered group after having left the place of origin. (HH) "International registration plan" means a reciprocal agreement of member jurisdictions that is endorsed by the American association of motor vehicle administrators, and that promotes and encourages the fullest possible use of the highway system by authorizing apportioned registration of fleets of vehicles and recognizing registration of vehicles apportioned in member jurisdictions. (II) "Restricted plate" means a license plate that has a restriction of time, geographic area, mileage, or commodity, and includes license plates issued to farm trucks under division (J) of section 4503.04 of the Revised Code. (JJ) "Gross vehicle weight," with regard to any commercial car, trailer, semitrailer, or bus that is taxed at the rates established under section 4503.042 or 4503.65 of the Revised Code, means the unladen weight of the vehicle fully equipped plus the maximum weight of the load to be carried on the vehicle. (KK) "Combined gross vehicle weight" with regard to any combination of a commercial car, trailer, and semitrailer, that is taxed at the rates established under section 4503.042 or 4503.65 of the Revised Code, means the total unladen weight of the combination of vehicles fully equipped plus the maximum weight of the load to be carried on that combination of vehicles. (LL) "Chauffeured limousine" means a motor vehicle that is designed to carry nine or fewer passengers and is operated for hire pursuant to a prearranged contract for the transportation of passengers on public roads and highways along a route under the control of the person hiring the vehicle and not over a defined and regular route. "Prearranged contract" means an agreement, made in advance of boarding, to provide transportation from a specific location in a chauffeured limousine. "Chauffeured limousine" does not include any vehicle that is used exclusively in the business of funeral directing. (MM) "Manufactured home" has the same meaning as in division (C)(4) of section 3781.06 of the Revised Code. (NN) "Acquired situs," with respect to a manufactured home or a mobile home, means to become located in this state by the placement of the home on real property, but does not include the placement of a manufactured home or a mobile home in the inventory of a new motor vehicle dealer or the inventory of a manufacturer, remanufacturer, or distributor of manufactured or mobile homes. (OO) "Electronic" includes electrical, digital, magnetic, optical, electromagnetic, or any other form of technology that entails capabilities similar to these technologies. (PP) "Electronic record" means a record generated, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means for use in an information system or for transmission from one information system to another. (QQ) "Electronic signature" means a signature in electronic form attached to or logically associated with an electronic record. (RR) "Financial transaction device" has the same meaning as in division (A) of section 113.40 of the Revised Code. (SS) "Electronic motor vehicle dealer" means a motor vehicle dealer licensed under Chapter 4517. of the Revised Code whom the registrar of motor vehicles determines meets the criteria designated in section 4503.035 of the Revised Code for electronic motor vehicle dealers and designates as an electronic motor vehicle dealer under that section. (TT) "Electric personal assistive mobility device" means a self-balancing two non-tandem wheeled device that is designed to transport only one person, has an electric propulsion system of an average of seven hundred fifty watts, and when ridden on a paved level surface by an operator who weighs one hundred seventy pounds has a maximum speed of less than twenty miles per hour. (UU) "Limited driving privileges" means the privilege to operate a motor vehicle that a court grants under section 4510.021 of the Revised Code to a person whose driver's or commercial driver's license or permit or nonresident operating privilege has been suspended. (VV) "Utility vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle designed with a bed, principally for the purpose of transporting material or cargo in connection with construction, agricultural, forestry, grounds maintenance, lawn and garden, materials handling, or similar activities. (WW) "Low-speed vehicle" means a three- or four-wheeled motor vehicle with an attainable speed in one mile on a paved level surface of more than twenty miles per hour but not more than twenty-five miles per hour and with a gross vehicle weight rating less than three thousand pounds. (XX) "Under-speed vehicle" means a three- or four-wheeled vehicle, including a vehicle commonly known as a golf cart, with an attainable speed on a paved level surface of not more than twenty miles per hour and with a gross vehicle weight rating less than three thousand pounds. (YY) "Motor-driven cycle or motor scooter" means any vehicle designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground, with a seat for the driver and floor pad for the driver's feet, and is equipped with a motor with a piston displacement between fifty and one hundred cubic centimeters piston displacement that produces not more than five brake horsepower and is capable of propelling the vehicle at a speed greater than twenty miles per hour on a level surface. (ZZ) "Motorcycle" means a motor vehicle with motive power having a seat or saddle for the use of the operator, designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground, and having no occupant compartment top or occupant compartment top that can be installed or removed by the user. (AAA) "Cab-enclosed motorcycle" means a motor vehicle with motive power having a seat or saddle for the use of the operator, designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground, and having an occupant compartment top or an occupant compartment top that is installed. (BBB) "Mini-truck" means a vehicle that has four wheels, is propelled by an electric motor with a rated power of seven thousand five hundred watts or less or an internal combustion engine with a piston displacement capacity of six hundred sixty cubic centimeters or less, has a total dry weight of nine hundred to two thousand two hundred pounds, contains an enclosed cabin and a seat for the vehicle operator, resembles a pickup truck or van with a cargo area or bed located at the rear of the vehicle, and was not originally manufactured to meet federal motor vehicle safety standards. (CCC) "Autocycle" means a three-wheeled motorcycle that is manufactured to comply with federal safety requirements for motorcycles and that is equipped with safety belts, a steering wheel, and seating that does not require the operator to straddle or sit astride to ride the motorcycle. (DDD) "Plug-in hybrid electric motor vehicle" means a passenger car powered in part by a battery cell energy system that can be recharged via an external source of electricity. (EEE) "Hybrid motor vehicle" means a passenger car powered by an internal propulsion system consisting of both of the following: (1) A combustion engine; (2) A battery cell energy system that cannot be recharged via an external source of electricity but can be recharged by other vehicle mechanisms that capture and store electric energy. (FFF) "Low-speed micromobility device" means a device weighing less than one hundred pounds that has handlebars, is propelled by an electric motor or human power, and has an attainable speed on a paved level surface of not more than twenty miles per hour when propelled by the electric motor. (GGG) "Specialty license plate" means a license plate, authorized by the general assembly, that displays a combination of words, markings, logos, or other graphic artwork that is in addition to the words, images, and distinctive numbers and letters required by section 4503.22 of the Revised Code. (HHH) "Battery electric motor vehicle" means a passenger car powered wholly by a battery cell energy system that can be recharged via an external source of electricity. (III) "Adaptive mobility vehicle" means a passenger car or bus that is designed, modified, or equipped to enable an individual with a disability to operate or to be transported in the passenger car or bus, in accordance with 49 C.F.R. part 568 or 595, and contains at least one of the following: (1) An electronic or mechanical lift that enables a person to enter or exit the motor vehicle while occupying a wheelchair or scooter; (2) An electronic or mechanical wheelchair ramp; (3) A system to secure a wheelchair or scooter in order to allow a person to operate or be transported safely while occupying that wheelchair or scooter. (JJJ) "Replica motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is constructed, assembled, or modified so as to replicate the make, model, and model year of a motor vehicle that is at least twenty-five years old. (KKK) "Humvee" means a high mobility multipurpose wheeled vehicle originally manufactured for military purposes. Sec. 4503.184. (A)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (B) of this section, a person may use a humvee for general transportation and operate it on the public roads and highways if the owner of the humvee does both of the following: (a) Meets all of the requirements specified in division (A)(2) of this section; (b) Registers that humvee in accordance with the procedures for and the costs of registering a passenger car under Chapter 4503. of the Revised Code. (2) Prior to registration, the owner of the humvee shall do all of the following: (a) Ensure that the humvee is modified to be in safe operating condition and that its equipment is in conformity with Chapter 4513. of the Revised Code so as to be able to pass a vehicle inspection; (b) Ensure that the humvee is covered by and included in any proof of financial responsibility maintained by the owner as required by section 4509.101 of the Revised Code; (c) Obtain a certificate of title in accordance with section 4505.073 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) As used in division (B) of this section, "limited purpose" means either of the following: (a) For participation in club activities, exhibitions, tours, parades, and similar uses; (b) Travel to and from a location where maintenance is performed on a humvee. (2) Unless a humvee is registered in accordance with division (A) of this section, no person shall use a humvee for general transportation. However, a person may operate a humvee on the public roads and highways for a limited purpose if the person does all of the following: (a) Registers the humvee with the registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar on a form and in a manner prescribed by the registrar; (b) Pays the registration fee specified in division (B)(3) of this section; (c) Executes an affidavit that the vehicle for which the registration is requested is operated solely for a limited purpose. (3) In lieu of the annual license tax levied in sections 4503.02 and 4503.04 of the Revised Code, the registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar shall collect a license fee of ten dollars for the registration of a humvee under division (B) of this section. The fee shall be deposited into the public safety - highway purposes fund established in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. (4) Notwithstanding section 4503.21 of the Revised Code, the owner of a humvee that is registered under division (B) of this section shall display the assigned registration number of the vehicle by painting the number on the front and rear of the vehicle. The number shall be painted, in accordance with the size and style specifications established for numerals and letters shown on license plates in section 4503.22 of the Revised Code, in a color that contrasts clearly with the color of the humvee and shall be legible and visible at all times. If ownership of the humvee is transferred, the transferor shall remove or obliterate the registration numbers painted on the humvee. (5) The registration certificate shall be kept in the humvee at all times that the humvee is operated on the public roads and highways in this state. (C) No registration issued pursuant to this section need specify the weight of the humvee. Sec. 4505.073. (A)(1) An owner of a humvee, prior to applying for registration of the humvee in accordance with division (A) of section 4503.184 of the Revised Code, shall apply to the clerk of a court of common pleas for a certificate of title for that humvee that removes the "OFF-ROAD USE ONLY" designation on the certificate of title. The application shall require the applicant to do both of the following: (a) Have the humvee inspected by the state highway patrol in the manner specified in sections 4505.111 and 4513.02 of the Revised Code; (b) Obtain an inspection report from the state highway patrol certifying that the humvee is in conformity with Chapter 4513. of the Revised Code. (2) Upon submission of a completed application, compliance with division (A)(1) of this section, and payment of the fee prescribed in section 4505.09 of the Revised Code, the clerk shall issue to the owner a certificate of title that does not include the "OFF-ROAD USE ONLY" designation. (B)(1) An owner of a humvee, prior to applying for registration of the humvee in accordance with division (B) of section 4503.184 of the Revised Code, shall apply to the clerk of a court of common pleas for a certificate of title for that humvee. Notwithstanding the limited authorization for operation of the humvee on public streets and highways under division (B) of that section, a certificate of title issued under division (B) of this section shall retain the "OFF-ROAD USE ONLY" designation. (2) Upon submission of a completed application and payment of the fee prescribed in section 4505.09 of the Revised Code, the clerk shall issue to the owner a certificate of title that includes the "OFF-ROAD USE ONLY" designation. (C)(1) When a clerk of a court of common pleas issues a duplicate certificate of title or memorandum certificate of title for a humvee previously titled in accordance with either division (A) or (B) of this section, that certificate of title shall be identical to the existing certificate of title. (2) Prior to issuance of a certificate of title under division (A) or (B) of this section, the owner of the humvee shall surrender to the clerk any existing certificate of title and submit to the clerk a copy of the inspection report, if applicable. (D) The clerk shall use reasonable care in performing the duties imposed on the clerk by this section in issuing a certificate of title pursuant to this section, but the clerk is not liable for any of the clerk's errors or omissions or those of the clerk's deputies or the automated title processing system in the performance of those duties. (E)(1) The registrar of motor vehicles shall ensure that any certificate of title of a humvee, including any subsequent, memorandum, or duplicate certificate of title, issued under this section complies with all of the following, as applicable: (a) It is in the same form as the original certificate of title. (b) It includes the make, model, and model year of the humvee. (c) It either removes the "OFF-ROAD USE ONLY" designation for certificates of title issued under division (A) of this section or retains the "OFF-ROAD USE ONLY" designation for certificates of title issued under division (B) of this section. (2) The registrar shall determine the exact location on the face of the certificate of title of the make, model, and model year of the humvee. The registrar shall develop an automated procedure within the automated title processing system for purposes of this section. Sec. 4505.08. (A) When the clerk of a court of common pleas issues a physical certificate of title, the clerk shall issue the certificate of title on a form and in a manner prescribed by the registrar of motor vehicles. The clerk shall file a copy of the physical evidence for the creation of the certificate of title in a manner prescribed by the registrar. A clerk may retain digital images of documents used as evidence for issuance of a certificate of title. Certified printouts of documents retained as digital images shall have the same evidentiary value as the original physical documents. The record of the issuance of the certificate of title shall be maintained in the automated title processing system. The clerk shall sign and affix the clerk's seal to the original certificate of title and, if there are no liens on the motor vehicle, shall deliver the certificate to the applicant or the selling dealer. If there are one or more liens on the motor vehicle, the certificate of title shall be delivered to the holder of the first lien or the selling dealer, who shall deliver the certificate of title to the holder of the first lien. The registrar shall prescribe a uniform method of numbering certificates of title, and such numbering shall be in such manner that the county of issuance is indicated. The clerk shall assign numbers to certificates of title in the manner prescribed by the registrar. The clerk shall file all certificates of title according to rules to be prescribed by the registrar, and the clerk shall maintain in the clerk's office indexes for the certificates of title. The clerk need not retain on file any current certificates of title, current duplicate certificates of title, current memorandum certificates of title, or current salvage certificates of title, or supporting evidence of them covering any motor vehicle or manufactured or mobile home for a period longer than seven years after the date of its filing; thereafter, the documents and supporting evidence may be destroyed. The clerk need not retain on file any inactive records, including certificates of title, duplicate certificates of title, or memorandum certificates of title, or supporting evidence of them, including the electronic record described in division (A) of section 4505.06 of the Revised Code, covering any motor vehicle or manufactured or mobile home for a period longer than five years after the date of its filing; thereafter, the documents and supporting evidence may be destroyed. The automated title processing system shall contain all active records and an index of the active records, a record and index of all inactive titles for ten years, and a record and index of all inactive titles for manufactured and mobile homes for thirty years. If the clerk provides a written copy of any information contained in the database, the copy shall be considered the original for purposes of the clerk certifying the record of the information for use in any legal proceeding. (B)(1) If the clerk issues a certificate of title for a motor vehicle that was last previously registered in another state, the clerk shall record verbatim, where practicable, in the space on the title described in division (B)(19) of section 4505.07 of the Revised Code, the words that appear as a notation to the vehicle on the title issued by the previous state. These notations may include, but are not limited to, words to the effect that the vehicle was considered or was categorized by the state in which it was last previously registered to be a law enforcement vehicle or a taxicab or was once in a flood. (2) If the clerk, while issuing a certificate of title for a motor vehicle that was last previously registered in another state, receives information from the automated title processing system indicating that a title to the vehicle previously was issued by this state and that the previous title contained notations that appeared in the space described in division (B)(19) or (20) of section 4505.07 of the Revised Code, the clerk shall enter the notations that appeared on the previous certificate of title issued by this state on the new certificate of title in the space described in division (B)(19) or (20) of section 4505.07 of the Revised Code, irrespective of whether the notations appear on the certificate of title issued by the state in which the vehicle was last previously registered. (3) If the clerk, while issuing a certificate of title for a motor vehicle that was last previously registered in another state, receives information from the automated title processing system indicating that the vehicle was previously issued a title by this state and that the previous title bore the notation "REBUILT SALVAGE" as required by division (E) of section 4505.11 of the Revised Code, or the previous title to the vehicle issued by this state was a salvage certificate of title, the clerk shall cause the certificate of title the clerk issues to bear the notation "REBUILT SALVAGE" in the location prescribed by the registrar pursuant to that division. (4) If the clerk, while issuing a certificate of title for a motor vehicle that was last previously registered in another state, receives information from the automated title processing system indicating that the vehicle was previously issued a title by this state and that the previous title included the notation "REPLICA" in accordance with section 4505.072 of the Revised Code, or the previous title to the vehicle issued by another state indicates that the vehicle is a replica motor vehicle, the clerk shall cause the certificate of title the clerk issues to display the notation "REPLICA" in the location prescribed by the registrar pursuant to that section. (5) If the clerk, while issuing a certificate of title for a humvee that was last previously registered in another state, receives information from the automated title processing system indicating that the humvee was previously issued a title by this state and that the previous title removed the notation "OFF-ROAD USE ONLY" in accordance with division (A) of section 4505.073 of the Revised Code, or the previous title to the humvee issued by another state removed any notation that the humvee was for off-road use only, the clerk shall not include the designation "OFF-ROAD USE ONLY" on the certificate of title that the clerk issues. (C) When the clerk issues a certificate of title for a motor vehicle that was last previously registered in this state and was a law enforcement vehicle or a taxicab or was once in a flood, the clerk shall record that information in the space on the title described in division (B)(20) of section 4505.07 of the Revised Code. The registrar, by rule, may prescribe any additional uses of or happenings to a motor vehicle that the registrar has reason to believe should be noted on the certificate of title as provided in this division. (D) The clerk shall use reasonable care in recording or entering onto titles the clerk issues any notation and information the clerk is required by divisions (B) and (C) of this section to record or enter and in causing the titles the clerk issues to bear any notation required by those divisions, but the clerk is not liable for any of the clerk's errors or omissions or those of the clerk's deputies, or the automated title processing system, in the performance of the duties imposed on the clerk by this section. (E) The clerk may issue a duplicate title, when duly applied for, of any title that has been destroyed as herein provided. (F) Except as provided in section 4505.021 of the Revised Code, the clerk shall issue a physical certificate of title to an applicant unless the applicant specifically requests the clerk not to issue a physical certificate of title and instead to issue an electronic certificate of title. The fact that a physical certificate of title is not issued for a motor vehicle does not affect ownership of the vehicle. In that case, when the clerk completes the process of entering certificate of title application information into the automated title processing system, the effect of the completion of the process is the same as if the clerk actually issued a physical certificate of title for the motor vehicle. (G) An electronic motor vehicle dealer who applies for a certificate of title on behalf of a customer who purchases a motor vehicle from the dealer may print a non-negotiable evidence of ownership for the customer if the customer so requests. The authorization to print the non-negotiable evidence of ownership shall come from the clerk with whom the dealer makes application for the certificate of title for the customer, but the printing by the dealer does not create an agency relationship of any kind between the dealer and the clerk. (H) The owner of a motor vehicle may apply at any time to a clerk of a court of common pleas for a non-negotiable evidence of ownership for the motor vehicle. (I) In accordance with rules adopted by the registrar, a clerk may issue a certificate of title applied for by an agent of a licensed motor vehicle dealer when that agent has a properly executed power of attorney from the dealer. Sec. 4505.111. (A)(A)(1) Every motor vehicle, other than a manufactured home, a mobile home, or a motor vehicle as provided in divisions (C), (D), and (E) of section 4505.11 of the Revised Code, that is assembled from component parts by a person other than the manufacturer, shall be inspected by the state highway patrol prior to issuance of title to the motor vehicle. (2) Every humvee to be registered under division (A) of section 4503.184 of the Revised Code shall be inspected by the state highway patrol prior to issuance of title and registration to that humvee. (3) An owner of a humvee registered or to be registered under division (B) of section 4503.184 of the Revised Code may request the state highway patrol to inspect the humvee. The state highway patrol shall inspect such humvee. (B) The inspection shall include establishing proof of ownership and an inspection of the motor number and vehicle identification number of the motor vehicle or serial number of the humvee, and any items of equipment the director of public safety considers advisable and requires to be inspected by rule. A fee of fifty dollars shall be assessed by the state highway patrol for each inspection made pursuant to this section, and shall be deposited in the public safety - highway purposes fund established by section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. (B)(C) Whoever violates this section shall be fined not more than two thousand dollars, imprisoned not more than one year, or both. Sec. 4513.02. (A) No person shall drive or move, or cause or knowingly permit to be driven or moved, on any highway any vehicle or combination of vehicles which is in such unsafe condition as to endanger any person. (B) When directed by any state highway patrol trooper, the operator of any motor vehicle shall stop and submit such motor vehicle to an inspection under division (B)(1) or (2) of this section, as appropriate, and such tests as are necessary. (1) Any motor vehicle not subject to inspection by the public utilities commission shall be inspected and tested to determine whether it is unsafe or not equipped as required by law, or that its equipment is not in proper adjustment or repair, or in violation of the equipment provisions of Chapter 4513. of the Revised Code. Such inspection shall be made with respect to the brakes, lights, turn signals, steering, horns and warning devices, glass, mirrors, exhaust system, windshield wipers, tires, and such other items of equipment as designated by the superintendent of the state highway patrol by rule or regulation adopted pursuant to sections 119.01 to 119.13 of the Revised Code. Upon determining that a motor vehicle is in safe operating condition and its equipment in conformity with Chapter 4513. of the Revised Code, the inspecting officer shall issue to the operator an official inspection sticker, which shall be in such form as the superintendent prescribes except that its color shall vary from year to year. (2) Any motor vehicle subject to inspection by the public utilities commission shall be inspected and tested in accordance with rules adopted by the commission. Upon determining that the vehicle and operator are in compliance with rules adopted by the commission, the inspecting officer shall issue to the operator an appropriate official inspection sticker. (C) The superintendent of the state highway patrol, pursuant to sections 119.01 to 119.13 of the Revised Code, shall determine and promulgate standards for any inspection program conducted by a political subdivision of this state. These standards shall exempt licensed collector's vehicles, humvees registered under division (B) of section 4503.184 of the Revised Code, and historical motor vehicles from inspection. Any motor vehicle bearing a valid certificate of inspection issued by another state or a political subdivision of this state whose inspection program conforms to the superintendent's standards, and any licensed collector's vehicle, humvee registered under division (B) of section 4503.184 of the Revised Code, or historical motor vehicle which is not in a condition which endangers the safety of persons or property, shall be exempt from the tests provided in division (B) of this section. (D) Every person, firm, association, or corporation that, in the conduct of its business, owns and operates not less than fifteen motor vehicles in this state that are not subject to regulation by the public utilities commission and that, for the purpose of storing, repairing, maintaining, and servicing such motor vehicles, equips and operates one or more service departments within this state, may file with the superintendent of the state highway patrol applications for permits for such service departments as official inspection stations for its own motor vehicles. Upon receiving an application for each such service department, and after determining that it is properly equipped and has competent personnel to perform the inspections referred to in this section, the superintendent shall issue the necessary inspection stickers and permit to operate as an official inspection station. Any such person who has had one or more service departments so designated as official inspection stations may have motor vehicles that are owned and operated by the person and that are not subject to regulation by the public utilities commission, excepting private passenger cars owned by the person or the person's employees, inspected at such service department; and any motor vehicle bearing a valid certificate of inspection issued by such service department shall be exempt from the tests provided in division (B) of this section. No permit for an official inspection station shall be assigned or transferred or used at any location other than therein designated, and every such permit shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the location designated. If a person, firm, association, or corporation owns and operates fifteen or more motor vehicles in the conduct of business and is subject to regulation by the public utilities commission, that person, firm, association, or corporation is not eligible to apply to the superintendent for permits to enable any of its service departments to serve as official inspection stations for its own motor vehicles. (E) When any motor vehicle is found to be unsafe for operation, the inspecting officer may order it removed from the highway and not operated, except for purposes of removal and repair, until it has been repaired pursuant to a repair order as provided in division (F) of this section. (F) When any motor vehicle is found to be defective or in violation of Chapter 4513. of the Revised Code, the inspecting officer may issue a repair order, in such form and containing such information as the superintendent shall prescribe, to the owner or operator of the motor vehicle. The owner or operator shall thereupon obtain such repairs as are required and shall, as directed by the inspecting officer, return the repair order together with proof of compliance with its provisions. When any motor vehicle or operator subject to rules of the public utilities commission fails the inspection, the inspecting officer shall issue an appropriate order to obtain compliance with such rules. (G) Sections 4513.01 to 4513.37 of the Revised Code, with respect to equipment on vehicles, do not apply to implements of husbandry, road machinery, road rollers, or agricultural tractors except as made applicable to such articles of machinery. (H) Whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. Sec. 4513.381. (A) No person shall be prohibited from owning or operating a humvee that is registered under division (B) of section 4503.184 of the Revised Code that is equipped with a feature of design, type of material, or article of equipment that was not in violation of the United States department of defense equipment standards for the humvee in effect during the calendar year the humvee was manufactured. (B) No person shall be prohibited from owning or operating a humvee that is registered under division (B) of section 4503.184 of the Revised Code for failing to comply with an equipment provision contained in Chapter 4513. of the Revised Code or in any state rule. (C)(1) No owner of a humvee that is registered under division (B) of section 4503.184 of the Revised Code shall be required to comply with an emission, noise control, or fuel usage provision contained in a law or rule of this state or its political subdivisions. (2) No owner of a humvee that is registered under division (B) of section 4503.184 of the Revised Code shall be prohibited from operating that humvee for failing to comply with an emission, noise control, or fuel usage provision contained in a law or rule of this state or its political subdivisions. (D) This section does not apply to a humvee that is registered under division (A) of section 4503.184 of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing sections 4501.01, 4505.08, 4505.111, and 4513.02 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.